Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-210.01
Environmental hazard, defined.

Environmental hazard shall mean any contamination of the air, water, or land surface or subsurface caused by any substance adversely affecting human health or safety, if such substance has been declared hazardous by a federal or state statute, rule, or regulation.

Laws 1989, LB 706, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 13.